Hawaii, session 2025, HB703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's kupuna are at significant risk of homelessness.  As rental prices have experienced dramatic increases statewide, more kupuna, who are on fixed incomes, struggle to secure affordable housing.  Presently, the state rent supplemental program for kupuna provides support for qualified kupuna who are homeless or at imminent risk of being homeless.  However, this critical program will be sunset in 2026, creating uncertainty for existing participants in the program.  Therefore, extending the sunset date will ensure continued access to critical rent supplement assistance. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to extend the sunset date of the state rent supplemental program for kupuna to continue to accommodate the housing needs of qualified participants. SECTION 2. Act 98, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, is amended by amending section 6 to read as follows: "SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2023, and shall be repealed on June 30, [2026.] 2028." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.